Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4630
Savings clause.

The Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act does not affect the validity of a temporary court order concerning custodial responsibility during deployment which was entered before January 1, 2016.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 30.